Maryland, session 2025, HB1390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1390*

HOUSE BILL 1390
(DD) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PERSONAL CASUALTY LOSS” MEANS LOSS
OF PROPERTY NOT CONNECTED WITH A TRADE OR BUSINESS OR A TRANSACTION
ENTERED INTO FOR PROFIT IF THE LOSS ARISES FROM THEFT OR A FRAUD SCHEME.
(2) THE SUBTRACTION ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION INCLUDES:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF ANY PERSONAL CASUALTY LOSS OF A
TAXPAYER RELATED TO A THEFT OR FRAUD SCHEME THAT OCCURRED DURING THE
TAXABLE YEAR THAT WAS ALLOWED AS A DEDUCTION UNDER § 165 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2018; AND
(II) ANY EXPENSES OR PENALTIES INCURRED DURING THE
TAXABLE YEAR RELATED TO THE THEFT OR FRAUD SCHEME.
(3) TO QUALIFY FOR THE SUBTRACTION ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE TAXPAYER SHALL ATTACH TO THE TAXPAYER’S TAX RETURN A
POLICE REPORT ESTABLISHING THAT THE THEFT OR FRAUD SCHEME OCCURRED.
(4) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR, THE SUBTRACTION ALLOWED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT OF ANY DEDUCTION
RELATED TO THE THEFT OR FRAUD SCHEME THAT IS ALLOWED UNDER § 165 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.